Louisiana, session 2026, HB281.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1892.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1892.4. Disclosure of policy coverage information upon written request;
procedure; confidentiality
A.(1)(a) Every insurer providing motor vehicle insurance coverage in this
state that is or may be liable to pay all or part of a third-party claim arising out of an
automobile accident shall provide a statement that includes each known policy of
motor vehicle liability insurance issued by the insurer that may provide coverage for
the subject accident within thirty days of receiving a written request from the
claimant or his attorney for such information.
(b) The statement shall include all of the following:
(i) The name of the insurer.
(ii) The name of each insured, relative to the vehicle subject to the accident.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1033 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 281
(iii) The limits of coverage for each policy, relative to the subject vehicle,
or a statement indicating that the insurer did not issue a policy to the insured that
could provide coverage for the automobile accident.
(2)(a) A written request from a claimant for a statement from an insurer
provided pursuant to this Section shall include all of the following:
(i) The specific nature of the claim being asserted.
(ii) A copy of the accident report from which the claim is derived.
(b) A written request made by an attorney on behalf of a claimant pursuant
to this Section shall state that the attorney is authorized to make such a request and
provide the name of the claimant upon whose behalf the request is made, in addition
to the requirements of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(c) The written request shall be delivered to the insurer's designated agent
for service of process of the insurer by certified mail.
B. If a written request provided for in Subsection A of this Section does not
contain sufficient information to allow compliance with this Section, the insurer
upon whom the request was made shall respond to the claimant or his attorney in
writing, sent by certified mail to the address provided by the claimant or his attorney
in the original request, stating the specific additional information needed to respond
to the request.
C. An insurer that provides a copy of the declaration page of each policy that
may provide third-party coverage is considered in compliance with the requirements
of this Section.
D. The information provided to a claimant or his attorney as required by
Subsection A of this Section shall not create a waiver of any defenses available to
the insurer, shall not be deemed an admission of liability by the insurer or its insured,
and shall not be admissible as evidence.
E. The information provided to a claimant or his attorney as required by
Subsection A of this Section shall be amended, and an updated statement shall be
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1033 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 281
issued to the claimant or his attorney by certified mail, upon the discovery of facts
inconsistent with, or in addition to, the information provided in the initial statement.
F. The information received by a claimant or his attorney pursuant to this
Section shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to any outside party. Upon
final disposition of the claim, the claimant or his attorney shall destroy all
information received pursuant to this Section.
G. The provisions of this Section shall be enforced through the provisions
of the Louisiana Insurance Code.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective and retroactive
application and shall apply to all pending claims and causes of action that have not been
resolved by settlement or judicial award on or before the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.